Wyoming, session 2025, HB0223.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-44-101 through 1-44-105 are created
to read:

CHAPTER 44
LAWSUITS AGAINST PUBLIC PARTICIPATION
HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550

1-44-101. Short title; definitions; purposes.

(a) This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Wyoming Anti-SLAPP Act."

(b) As used in this act:

(i) "Strategic lawsuit" means a strategic
lawsuit against public participation;

(ii) "This act" means W.S. 1-44-101 through
1-44-105.

(c) The purposes of this act are to:

(i) Ensure full participation by persons in the
robust discussion of issues in furtherance of the
constitutional rights of freedom of petition, freedom of
speech and freedom of expression in connection with any
matter of public concern. The concept of public concern
shall be construed broadly, excluding only matters of
purely private concern;
HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550

(ii) Recognize that litigation that hinders
those constitutional rights is disfavored and should be
resolved quickly with minimum cost to those exercising
those constitutional rights that are protected by the First
Amendment to the United States constitution and article 1,
section 20 of the Wyoming constitution.

1-44-102. Strategic lawsuits; immunity; procedure.

(a) All laws in this state shall be construed to
grant qualified immunity from suit, prosecution and civil
liability for any person in any action, case, claim,
administrative proceeding, arbitration or other legal
process that impacts the person's constitutional rights
under the First Amendment to the United States
constitution.

(b) A person may invoke the qualified immunity
provided under subsection (a) of this section at any time.
For purposes of this section, the qualified immunity
provided under subsection (a) of this section may be waived
if a person substantially litigates the case beyond a
HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550
jurisdictional challenge before raising the immunity,
unless facts or circumstances are later discovered
demonstrating that the qualified immunity applies and the
facts were not available or reasonably discoverable by the
person earlier in the case.

(c) In any case or lawsuit in which a person asserts
that the claims, counterclaims, crossclaims or discovery
against a person are based, either in whole or in part, on
the person's exercise of the constitutional right of
petition, freedom of speech or freedom of expression in
connection with any matter of public concern under the
United States or Wyoming constitutions, the person may move
to dismiss or otherwise dispose of the case or lawsuit as
expeditiously as possible based on the immunity provided in
subsection (a) of this section. For purposes of this
subsection:

(i) A person may invoke the immunity by showing
that a claim, counterclaim or crossclaim is based on the
person's use of the rights afforded under the First
Amendment to the United States constitution or article 1,
section 20 of the Wyoming constitution;
HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550

(ii) The immunity may be invoked if a claim,
action, proceeding, counterclaim or crossclaim is based on
at least one (1) action in furtherance of those rights,
even if the claim, action, proceeding, counterclaim or
crossclaim is also based on actions not in furtherance of
those constitutional rights;

(iii) The immunity shall be afforded to a person
if the responding party:

(A) Fails to present evidence or
supportable allegations, sufficient as a matter of law to
establish a prima facie case regarding each element of the
claim to survive a motion to dismiss or a judgment on the
pleadings; or

(B) Has presented evidence or supportable
allegations establishing a prima facie case regarding each
element of the claim, but a moving party has established
that there is no genuine issue of material fact and the
moving party is entitled to judgment as a matter of law on
the claim, as if the court were evaluating a motion for
HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550
summary judgment. Neither this subparagraph or subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph shall require the court to usurp the
role of the jury in evaluation of evidence or credibility
of evidence beyond what a court would do if evaluating a
motion to dismiss, a motion for judgment on the pleadings,
a motion for summary judgment or a motion for a directed
verdict. In all other respects, the right to trial by jury
will remain sacrosanct.

(d) Any denial of a motion to dismiss based on the
immunity provided under this section shall be immediately
appealable in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of
Appellate Procedure.

(e) If a motion to dismiss is denied under this
section, a person may bring a counterclaim to assert the
immunity provided under this section. If the finder of fact
finds that the initial claim was without merit and had the
effect or intent of suppressing rights protected under the
First Amendment to the United States constitution or
article 1, section 20 of the Wyoming constitution, the
court shall award compensatory damages, all costs and
reasonable attorney fees to the counterclaimant.
HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550

(f) If a person successfully invokes the immunity
provided under this section, whether on a motion to dismiss
or at trial, the person shall be entitled to all costs and
reasonable attorney fees for defending the case. If an
immunity decision is appealed and the person invoking
immunity prevails on appeal, the person shall be entitled
to all costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred while
defending the appeal. For purposes of this subsection:

(i) The state of Wyoming and its political
subdivisions shall be responsible for all damages, costs
and fees specified in this subsection, if the state or a
political subdivision is the plaintiff in the case;

(ii) A person may only recover costs and fees
for claims for which immunity is granted if all claims or
counterclaims are not dismissed under this section.

1-44-103. Strategic lawsuits; procedures.

(a) In federal courts and in foreign jurisdictions,
these procedural rules are severable from the immunity
HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550
established in W.S. 1-44-102. In Wyoming state courts and
wherever these rules are not in conflict with those of the
tribunal, if an action is brought against a person in
violation of the immunity from litigation, the person
against whom the action is brought may bring a special
motion to dismiss or a counterclaim, or both.

(b) A motion to dismiss based on the immunity
provided in W.S. 1-44-102 shall be filed not less than
seven (7) days after a notice of intent to file a motion to
dismiss is served on the opposing party.

(c) Upon the filing of a motion to dismiss based on
the immunity provided in W.S. 1-44-102, the court shall:

(i) Determine whether the moving party has
established by a preponderance of the evidence that the
claim is entitled to immunity under W.S. 1-44-102;

(ii) If the court determines that the moving
party has shown its entitlement to immunity, determine
whether the nonmoving party has demonstrated, with
HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550
sufficient evidence, a probability of prevailing on the
claim;

(iii) If the court determines that the nonmoving
party has established its burden under paragraph (ii) of
this subsection, ensure that the determination shall not:

(A) Be admitted into evidence at any
subsequent stage of the proceeding;

(B) Affect the burden of proof that is
applied in the underlying action or proceeding.

(iv) Consider any evidence that may be material
in making the required determinations under this
subsection;

(v) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph
(iv) of this subsection, stay all other actions and
activities in the case, including discovery and motions
pending a ruling by the court on the immunity motion and
the disposition of any appeal from the ruling on the
immunity motion;
HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550

(vi) Rule on the immunity motion not later than
thirty (30) business days after the motion is filed. The
deadline specified in this paragraph may be extended by a
showing of good cause.

(d) Upon a showing that information necessary to
support or oppose the motion to dismiss is in the
possession of another person and is not reasonably
available without discovery, the court shall allow limited
discovery for purposes of obtaining that information. For
purposes of this subsection:

(i) A separate motion shall be filed to seek
limited discovery under this subsection and must be
accompanied by an affidavit signed under penalty of
perjury;

(ii) The motion for limited discovery shall
include, with specificity, the discovery requested, the
reason the discovery is necessary and why the information
cannot be obtained in any other way;

HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550
(iii) If the motion lacks specificity, the
motion shall be denied, and the nonmoving party shall be
entitled to reasonable attorney fees for responding to the
motion;

(iv) Before bringing a motion for limited
discovery under this subsection, the moving party shall
meet and confer with the opposing party to resolve the
matter without a motion. If the nonmoving party has
unreasonably declined to agree to the discovery, the moving
party shall be entitled to reasonable attorney fees
incurred by bringing the motion.

(e) If the court dismisses an action under a motion
to dismiss based on the immunity provided in W.S. 1-44-102,
the dismissal shall be treated as an adjudication on the
merits.

(f) If the plaintiff in a strategic lawsuit moves to
dismiss the action or files notice of intent to dismiss the
action, or if the plaintiff seeks to amend the complaint,
after a motion to dismiss based on the immunity provided in
W.S. 1-44-102 is filed:
HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550

(i) The plaintiff's motion to dismiss or notice
shall function as an admission that the immunity motion is
meritorious, and the court shall grant the immunity motion;

(ii) The plaintiff's motion to amend shall
function as an admission that the immunity motion is
meritorious as to any claims that the motion to amend would
remove.

(g) The court may modify any deadlines under this
section if necessary to serve the interests of justice.

1-44-104. Strategic participation lawsuits; separate
actions and counterclaims.

(a) If any claim, action, administrative proceeding,
arbitration or any similar process is brought as a
strategic lawsuit against a person, the person may invoke
the immunity provided in W.S. 1-44-102 through a separate
action or counterclaim. For purposes of this section, a
person may bring a separate action after conclusion of the
strategic lawsuit.
HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550

(b) If a strategic lawsuit is brought against a
person and the person successfully invokes immunity under
this chapter, the person may bring a separate action to
recover costs and attorney fees that are not awarded by the
court in accordance with this chapter. For purposes of this
subsection:

(i) A person shall prevail in an action brought
under this subsection if the strategic lawsuit was without
merit and had the effect or intent of suppressing rights
provided under the First Amendment to the United States
constitution;

(ii) Upon prevailing in an action under this
subsection, a person shall be entitled to statutory damages
of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00),
compensatory damages, reasonable attorney fees and costs.

(c) A person who is a Wyoming citizen shall have a
cause of action if the person is subject to a strategic
lawsuit in another jurisdiction, the other jurisdiction
declines to apply the immunity provided in this chapter and
HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550
the person prevails in the strategic lawsuit. To prevail in
a cause of action under this section:

(i) The strategic lawsuit would have been
subject to this chapter if brought in Wyoming;

(ii) The person attempted to invoke the immunity
provided in this chapter, but the other jurisdiction
declined to apply the immunity;

(iii) The person prevailed in that foreign
action, including a dismissal without prejudice or a
dismissal for a lack of jurisdiction;

(iv) The person gave the plaintiff in the
strategic lawsuit notice, in writing, that if the person
prevailed in the plaintiff's strategic lawsuit, the person
would be entitled to bring a cause of action in Wyoming
under this subsection.

(d) A person who prevails in a cause of action
brought under subsection (c) of this section shall be
entitled to:
HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550

(i) Statutory damages of not less than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000.00) and not more than one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000.00);

(ii) Damages in an amount equal to the actual
costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred in the foreign
action incurred after providing notice specified in
paragraph (c)(iv) of this section;

(iii) All costs and reasonable attorney fees
incurred in the cause of action brought under subsection
(c) of this section;

(iv) Any other compensatory damages that the
court deems appropriate.

1-44-105. Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to all actions pending in the
state of Wyoming on July 1, 2025 and, to the fullest extent
permissible, to all actions pending in federal courts and
foreign jurisdictions.
HB0223

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0550

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0223